src/fst/affixes/propernouns.lexc
!! Proper noun inflection
!  ----------------------
!! The Tavringer Romani language proper nouns inflect in the same cases as regular
!! nouns, but with a colon (':') as separator.

LEXICON ProperNounCases
+N+Prop:%:   #  ;
+N+Prop:%:   #  ;
+N+Prop:%:   #  ;
+N+Prop:%:   #  ;
+N+Prop:%:   #  ;
+N+Prop:%:   #  ;
        -    Nouns  ;

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
